trunk/incubator/apertium-pl-ru.ru.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭЮЯабвгдеёжзийклмнопрстуфхцчшщъыьэюя</alphabet>
  <!-- include sdefs from elsewhere -->
  <pardefs>
  
    <pardef n="привет__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ся">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ся</l>
          <r>ся</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>сь</l>
          <r>ся</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="сь">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сь</l>
          <r>сь</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ся</l>
          <r>сь</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Абу-Даби__np">
      <e c="indeclinable placenames">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="NC"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="собак/а__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ою</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="мат/ь__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ь</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ь</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ери</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ери</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ери</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ерью</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ери</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ерей</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ерей</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ерям</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ерях</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ерями</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="бо/г__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>г</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гу</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гом</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ге</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>же</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ги</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гов</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гом</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гов</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гами</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гах</l>
          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- стул 1: chair -->
    <pardef n="стул/__n_1">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ья</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ей</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ям</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьев</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ьями</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="привет"><i>привет</i><par n="привет__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="спaсибо"><i>спaсибо</i><par n="привет__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="Как дела"><i>Как<b/>дела</i><par n="привет__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="добрый день"><i>добрый<b/>день</i><par n="привет__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="собака"><i>собак</i><par n="собак/а__n"/></e>
    <e lm="мать"><i>мат</i><par n="мат/ь__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бог"><i>бо</i><par n="бо/г__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Абу-Даби"><i>Абу-Даби</i><par n="Абу-Даби__np"/></e>
